src/dictionaries/he_IL.aff
PFX a   0 ושלכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשככ וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשככ" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכל וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשכל" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכמ וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשכמ" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכמה וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשכמה" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשל וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשל" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשלכ וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשלכ" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשמ וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשמ" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשמה וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשמה" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשמכ וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשמכ" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמ וו
PFX a   0 ושמ" .
PFX a   0 ושמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמה וו
PFX a   0 ושמה" .
PFX a   0 ושמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמכ וו
PFX a   0 ושמכ" .
PFX a   0 ושמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמש [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמש וו
PFX a   0 ושמש" .
PFX a   0 ושמשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשב וו
PFX a   0 ושמשב" .
PFX a   0 ושמשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשבכ וו
PFX a   0 ושמשבכ" .
PFX a   0 ושמשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשה וו
PFX a   0 ושמשה" .
PFX a   0 ושמשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכ וו
PFX a   0 ושמשכ" .
PFX a   0 ושמשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכב וו
PFX a   0 ושמשכב" .
PFX a   0 ושמשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשככ וו
PFX a   0 ושמשככ" .
PFX a   0 ושמשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכל וו
PFX a   0 ושמשכל" .
PFX a   0 ושמשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכמ וו
PFX a   0 ושמשכמ" .
PFX a   0 ושמשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשכמה וו
PFX a   0 ושמשכמה" .
PFX a   0 ושמשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשל וו
PFX a   0 ושמשל" .
PFX a   0 ושמשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשלכ וו
PFX a   0 ושמשלכ" .
PFX a   0 ושמשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשמ וו
PFX a   0 ושמשמ" .
PFX a   0 ושמשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשמה וו
PFX a   0 ושמשמה" .
PFX a   0 ושמשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושמשמכ וו
PFX a   0 ושמשמכ" .
PFX a   0 ושמשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כ וו
PFX a   0 כ" .
PFX a   0 כו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כב [^ו]
PFX a   0 כב וו
PFX a   0 כב" .
PFX a   0 כבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ככ וו
PFX a   0 ככ" .
PFX a   0 ככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כל [^ו]
PFX a   0 כל וו
PFX a   0 כל" .
PFX a   0 כלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כמ וו
PFX a   0 כמ" .
PFX a   0 כמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 כמה וו
PFX a   0 כמה" .
PFX a   0 כמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כש [^ו]
PFX a   0 כש וו
PFX a   0 כש" .
PFX a   0 כשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשב וו
PFX a   0 כשב" .
PFX a   0 כשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשבכ וו
PFX a   0 כשבכ" .
PFX a   0 כשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשה וו
PFX a   0 כשה" .
PFX a   0 כשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכ וו
PFX a   0 כשכ" .
PFX a   0 כשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכב וו
PFX a   0 כשכב" .
PFX a   0 כשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשככ וו
PFX a   0 כשככ" .
PFX a   0 כשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכל וו
PFX a   0 כשכל" .
PFX a   0 כשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכמ וו
PFX a   0 כשכמ" .
PFX a   0 כשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשכמה וו
PFX a   0 כשכמה" .
PFX a   0 כשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשל [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשל וו
PFX a   0 כשל" .
PFX a   0 כשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשלכ וו
PFX a   0 כשלכ" .
PFX a   0 כשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשמ וו
PFX a   0 כשמ" .
PFX a   0 כשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשמה וו
PFX a   0 כשמה" .
PFX a   0 כשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 כשמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 כשמכ וו
PFX a   0 כשמכ" .
PFX a   0 כשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ל וו
PFX a   0 ל" .
PFX a   0 לו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכ וו
PFX a   0 לכ" .
PFX a   0 לכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכש [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכש וו
PFX a   0 לכש" .
PFX a   0 לכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשב וו
PFX a   0 לכשב" .
PFX a   0 לכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשבכ וו
PFX a   0 לכשבכ" .
PFX a   0 לכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשה וו
PFX a   0 לכשה" .
PFX a   0 לכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכ וו
PFX a   0 לכשכ" .
PFX a   0 לכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכב וו
PFX a   0 לכשכב" .
PFX a   0 לכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשככ וו
PFX a   0 לכשככ" .
PFX a   0 לכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכל וו
PFX a   0 לכשכל" .
PFX a   0 לכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכמ וו
PFX a   0 לכשכמ" .
PFX a   0 לכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשכמה וו
PFX a   0 לכשכמה" .
PFX a   0 לכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשל [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשל וו
PFX a   0 לכשל" .
PFX a   0 לכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשלכ וו
PFX a   0 לכשלכ" .
PFX a   0 לכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשמ וו
PFX a   0 לכשמ" .
PFX a   0 לכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשמה וו
PFX a   0 לכשמה" .
PFX a   0 לכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 לכשמכ וו
PFX a   0 לכשמכ" .
PFX a   0 לכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 מ [^ו]
PFX a   0 מ וו
PFX a   0 מ" .
PFX a   0 מו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 מב [^ו]
PFX a   0 מב וו
PFX a   0 מב" .
PFX a   0 מבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 מה [^ו]
PFX a   0 מה וו
PFX a   0 מה" .
PFX a   0 מהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 מכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 מכ וו
PFX a   0 מכ" .
PFX a   0 מכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 מל [^ו]
PFX a   0 מל וו
PFX a   0 מל" .
PFX a   0 מלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 מש [^ו]
PFX a   0 מש וו
PFX a   0 מש" .
PFX a   0 משו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משב [^ו]
PFX a   0 משב וו
PFX a   0 משב" .
PFX a   0 משבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 משבכ וו
PFX a   0 משבכ" .
PFX a   0 משבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משה [^ו]
PFX a   0 משה וו
PFX a   0 משה" .
PFX a   0 משהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 משכ וו
PFX a   0 משכ" .
PFX a   0 משכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 משכב וו
PFX a   0 משכב" .
PFX a   0 משכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 משככ וו
PFX a   0 משככ" .
PFX a   0 משככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 משכל וו
PFX a   0 משכל" .
PFX a   0 משכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 משכמ וו
PFX a   0 משכמ" .
PFX a   0 משכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 משכמה וו
PFX a   0 משכמה" .
PFX a   0 משכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משל [^ו]
PFX a   0 משל וו
PFX a   0 משל" .
PFX a   0 משלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 משלכ וו
PFX a   0 משלכ" .
PFX a   0 משלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 משמ וו
PFX a   0 משמ" .
PFX a   0 משמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 משמה וו
PFX a   0 משמה" .
PFX a   0 משמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 משמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 משמכ וו
PFX a   0 משמכ" .
PFX a   0 משמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ש [^ו]
PFX a   0 ש וו
PFX a   0 ש" .
PFX a   0 שו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שב [^ו]
PFX a   0 שב וו
PFX a   0 שב" .
PFX a   0 שבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 שבכ וו
PFX a   0 שבכ" .
PFX a   0 שבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שה [^ו]
PFX a   0 שה וו
PFX a   0 שה" .
PFX a   0 שהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכ וו
PFX a   0 שכ" .
PFX a   0 שכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכב וו
PFX a   0 שכב" .
PFX a   0 שכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 שככ וו
PFX a   0 שככ" .
PFX a   0 שככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכל וו
PFX a   0 שכל" .
PFX a   0 שכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכמ וו
PFX a   0 שכמ" .
PFX a   0 שכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכמה וו
PFX a   0 שכמה" .
PFX a   0 שכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכש [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכש וו
PFX a   0 שכש" .
PFX a   0 שכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשב וו
PFX a   0 שכשב" .
PFX a   0 שכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשבכ וו
PFX a   0 שכשבכ" .
PFX a   0 שכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשה וו
PFX a   0 שכשה" .
PFX a   0 שכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשכ וו
PFX a   0 שכשכ" .
PFX a   0 שכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשכב וו
PFX a   0 שכשכב" .
PFX a   0 שכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 שכשככ וו
PFX a   0 שכשככ" .
