src/dictionaries/he_IL.dic
אביבי/a
אגביים/a
אגרה/a
אדישות/a
אהבלית/a
אודותיי/a
אוות/a
אוטם/a
אומלל/a
אוסטרית/a
אופטימליים/a
אור/a
אורכות/a
אותנטיות/a
אחוות/a
אטום/a
איברי/a
איזהו/a
איכשהו/a
אימפולס/a
אינדיבידואליות/a
אינטלקט/a
אינסטינקטים/a
איפכא/a
אישים/a
אל"מית/a
אלות/a
אליפטית/a
אלפיון/a
אמבוש/a
אמינויות/a
אמרה/a
אנדוסקופים/a
אנושיות/a
אניס/a
אנרגטי/a
אסטניסיות/a
אסכולות/a
אסתמטית/a
אפידמיולוגית/a
אפליה/a
אפרסק/a
אצל/a
אקונומיות/a
אקסטטיות/a
אקרובט/a
ארובות/a
אריגות/a
ארכיונית/a
ארציות/a
אשמים/a
אתי/a
באוש/a
בדואיות/a
בהול/a
בודות/a
בוטניקה/a
בולמוסים/a
בועטים/a
בורים/a
בזיקות/a
בי/a
ביוכימיים/a
ביטחון/a
בינעירונית/a
בישוף/a
בלוטה/a
בליסטראות/a
בלתנו/a
בסיסיים/a
בצור/a
בראשיתיים/a
ברז/a
ברלינאים/a
ג'בטות/a
גאוגרפית/a
גבולי/a
גבשושיות/a
גואטמליים/a
גוזמאיות/a
גונבים/a
גורד/a
גזולים/a
גחמן/a
גינקולוגיות/a
גלם/a
גנות/a
גרוטסקי/a
גשום/a
דגן/a
דווקני/a
דוקרנים/a
דידך/a
דיספרופורציונית/a
דלקתי/a
דפקים/a
דריכויות/a
הבהרה/a
הגמשות/a
הוגנת/a
הונגרייה/a
הזלפות/a
הטעמות/a
הידור/a
היטמאות/a
הינדית/a
היעשות/a
הירגעות/a
הכלה/a
הלניסטים/a
הנהגה/a
הסתבנות/a
הענשה/a
הפרעה/a
הצרדות/a
הרוס/a
השאלות/a
השתדלויות/a
השתתות/a
התביישויות/a
התוודעות/a
התייחדות/a
התמגנויות/a
התנזלות/a
התעצבויות/a
התפשלות/a
התרוצצויות/a
וייטנאמיות/a
ז'יטונים/a
זוועתי/a
זיהומיים/a
זמירות/a
זרוע/a
חבלני/a
חובט/a
חולד/a
חוסכת/a
חורשים/a
חזרנים/a
חייטת/a
חירשות/a
חליטות/a
חמידות/a
חניכיים/a
חפים/a
חרגולים/a
חרש/a
חתומה/a
טהורים/a
טופח/a
טיול/a
טכניים/a
טניסאית/a
טרדנות/a
טרמפולינה/a
יבשתיים/a
יומיום/a
יחידתיות/a
יישור/a
יפעות/a
יריד/a
כבאות/a
כוהן/a
כופתות/a
כיכוב/a
כלבת/a
כמותם/a
כפיל/a
כרם/a
לבביות/a
להן/a
לולאות/a
לחש/a
ליפוף/a
לעיסה/a
מאבדות/a
מאוזנת/a
מאופסת/a
מאייתות/a
מאפשר/a
מבוגר/a
מבוררות/a
מבכים/a
מבריא/a
מגדלים/a
מגונן/a
מגליד/a
מגרענים/a
מדוגדג/a
מדיינים/a
מדקדקות/a
מהול/a
מהפנטים/a
מובחנת/a
מוגזת/a
מודלי/a
מוזכרות/a
מוחמצת/a
מוטעית/a
מוכש/a
מומטות/a
מונופוליסטיים/a
מוסיפה/a
מועילים/a
מופלאה/a
מופתעת/a
מוקדשות/a
מוקשה/a
מורפולוגיה/a
מושיטות/a
מושתלים/a
מזדווגים/a
מזויפות/a
מזלות/a
מזריקות/a
מחויגות/a
מחושבת/a
מחכים/a
מחנכת/a
מחרת/a
מטובעת/a
מטכ"ל/a
מטרידה/a
מיוחדים/a
מיטהרות/a
מייצאים/a
מימניות/a
מיקרוביולוגיות/a
מכובדת/a
מכחדים/a
מכס/a
מכתרת/a
מלוחך/a
מליחות/a
ממאירות/a
ממוסגרים/a
ממזער/a
ממסגרות/a
ממשות/a
מנדריניים/a
מנומקים/a
מנחם/a
מנסים/a
מנתבים/a
מסודרות/a
מסופוטמית/a
מסיירת/a
מסמר/a
מסריט/a
מסתמא/a
מעדנות/a
מעופף/a
מעיק/a
מעפש/a
מעשי/a
מפוכח/a
מפורשות/a
מפיקות/a
מפסקת/a
מפריסה/a
מצבור/a
מצונזרת/a
מצטלקות/a
מצלה/a
מצפינות/a
מקודד/a
מקורבת/a
מקלון/a
מקפיאות/a
מקרקע/a
מרדניות/a
מרופטת/a
מרימים/a
מרפא/a
מרתכת/a
משהק/a
משויכות/a
משופד/a
משחילות/a
משכונים/a
משמיטים/a
משעשעים/a
משקצת/a
משתזף/a
משתמע/a
מתאבכים/a
מתאפיינת/a
מתבכיינים/a
מתגלגלים/a
מתואגדות/a
מתוכנן/a
מתזזים/a
מתחנחנת/a
מתייגעת/a
מתירניים/a
מתלה/a
מתמטיקאי/a
מתמררים/a
מתנכרת/a
מתעודדת/a
מתעקם/a
מתפילים/a
מתפשטת/a
מתקפד/a
מתרונן/a
מתשאלים/a
נאצים/a
נבלל/a
נגיהה/a
נדומים/a
נהירות/a
נודעת/a
נומרולוגיה/a
נוקמים/a
נזיל/a
נחטפות/a
נחרכים/a
נטעים/a
ניז'רי/a
ניסיונות/a
ניתן/a
נכתבת/a
נמייה/a
ננגע/a
נסיינים/a
נעכרת/a
נפוחה/a
נפרצות/a
נצרכת/a
נקמניים/a
נרמסים/a
נשוי/a
נשנקים/a
נתקעים/a
סגנות/a
סוברניות/a
סולידריות/a
סוציאליסטיות/a
סחרחורות/a
סטרייטיות/a
סייסים/a
סינגפורי/a
סירחון/a
סלניום/a
סנגורים/a
ספוילר/a
ספרונים/a
סרבית/a
עבד/a
עדירות/a
עולה/a
עורף/a
עיטוש/a
עיתונאית/a
עמוסים/a
עסק/a
עקום/a
עריץ/a
עתודאים/a
פדייה/a
פוטוריסטיים/a
פומיות/a
פופוליסטי/a
פורצלן/a
פטורות/a
פיזוזים/a
פינוקים/a
פישול/a
פלכים/a
פנומנולוגיה/a
פסטורלית/a
פסקני/a
פקטורים/a
פרובינציאלי/a
פרוסטטות/a
פריזבי/a
פרנסות/a
פשטנית/a
צ'יטה/a
צדוקי/a
צוללניות/a
ציבורי/a
ציציות/a
צמיג/a
צפדת/a
צרכים/a
קדורניות/a
קודחות/a
קולוסליים/a
קומפילציות/a
קונספירציות/a
קופיצים/a
קטגוריים/a
קידה/a
קיפול/a
קלט/a
קמאיות/a
קנטורים/a
קפלייה/a
קרדיטים/a
קרים/a
קשה/a
ראשוניות/a
רגיעה/a
רובדיות/a
רוכבות/a
רוקדים/a
רטטים/a
ריצוי/a
רלוונטיות/a
רעועה/a
רפרודוקציה/a
רקובים/a
ש"ס/a
שבעתיים/a
שואלת/a
שוטפת/a
שוערים/a
שזופים/a
שטים/a
שיטתי/a
שיקוע/a
שלבים/a
שלמויות/a
שמרטפות/a
שעשוע/a
שקופים/a
שריקות/a
שתקניים/a
תבלין/a
תווים/a
תוקפים/a
תחומה/a
תיווכים/a
תכלס/a
תמוכה/a
תסמונות/a
תפילה/a
תקליטן/a
תרמודינמיים/a
